Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3902
Definitions.

In the Nebraska Uniform Adult Guardianship
and Protective Proceedings Jurisdiction Act:

(1) Adult means
an individual who has attained nineteen years of age;

(2) Conservator means
a person appointed by the court to administer the property of an adult, including
a person appointed under the Nebraska Probate Code for an adult;

(3) Guardian
means a person appointed by the court to make decisions regarding the person
of an adult, including a person appointed under the Nebraska Probate Code
for an adult;

(4) Guardianship order means an order appointing a guardian;

(5) Guardianship
proceeding means a judicial proceeding in which an order for the appointment
of a guardian is sought or has been issued;

(6) Incapacitated person means an adult
for whom a guardian has been appointed;

(7) Party means the respondent, petitioner,
guardian, conservator, or any other person allowed by the court to participate
in a guardianship or protective proceeding;

(8) Person, except in the term incapacitated
person or protected person, means an individual, corporation, business trust,
estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint
venture, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency,
or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity;

(9) Protected
person means an adult for whom a protective order has been issued;

(10) Protective
order means an order appointing a conservator or other order related to management
of an adult's property;

(11) Protective proceeding means a judicial proceeding in which
a protective order is sought or has been issued;

(12) Record means information
that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic
or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form;

(13) Respondent
means an adult for whom a protective order or the appointment of a guardian
is sought; and

(14) State means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia,
Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, a federally recognized Indian
tribe, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction
of the United States.

Laws 2011, LB157, § 6.